el: Μορφή χρωστικής ουσίας ζαχαροπλαστικής: Σταγόνες; Πούδρα; Τζελ; Υγρό; Χρώμα με βάση το λάδι; Πάστα; Στυλό / Μαρκαδόρος; Σκόνη; Σετ / Κιτ; Σπρέι / Αερογράφος; Άλλο
da: Form for fødevarefarve: Dråbe; Støv; Gel; Flydende; Oliebaseret pigment; Pasta; Tusch/pen; Pulver; Sæt; Spray/airbrush; Andet
en: Food coloring form: Drip; Dust; Gel; Liquid; Oil-based pigment; Paste; Pen / Marker; Powder; Set / Kit; Spray / Airbrush; Other
ja: 食品着色料: ドリップ; ダスト; ジェル; 液体; 油性顔料; ペースト; ペン/マーカー; パウダー; セット/キット; スプレー/エアブラシ; その他
sv: Typ av livsmedelsfärg: Dropp; Puder; Gel; Flytande; Oljebaserat pigment; Pasta; Penna/tuschpenna; Pulver; Set/kit; Spray/airbrush; Övrigt
de: Form des Lebensmittelfarbstoffs: Tropfen; Puder; Gel; Flüssig; Pigment auf Ölbasis; Paste; Stift / Marker; Pulver; Set / Paket; Spray / Airbrush; Sonstiges
fi: Elintarvikevärin muoto: Tiputettava; Tomu; Geeli; Neste; Öljypohjainen pigmentti; Tahna; Kynä/tussi; Jauhe; Setti/pakkaus; Suihke/kynäruisku; Muu
hu: Ételszínezék: Csepp; Finom por; Gél; Folyékony; Olajalapú pigment; Paszta; Toll / Filctoll; Por; Szett / Készlet; Spray / Festékszóró; Egyéb
pl: Barwnik spożywczy: Krople; Pyłek; Żel; Płyn; Pigment na bazie oleju; Pasta; Pisak / flamaster; Proszek; Zestaw; Spray / aerograf; Inna
pt-PT: corante alimentar: Gotas; Pó fino; Gel; Líquido; Pigmento à base de óleo; Pasta; Caneta/marcador; Pó; Conjunto/kit; Spray/aerógrafo; Outro
it: forma di colorante alimentare: Gocce; Polvere fine; Gel; Liquido; Pigmento a base d'olio; Pasta; Penna/pennarello; Polvere; Set/kit; Spray/aerografo; Altro
nb: Konditorfargeform: Drypp; Støv; Gel; Flytende; Oljebasert pigment; Pasta; Penn/tusj; Pulver; Sett; Spray / airbrush; Annet
ro-RO: Formă colorant alimentar: Picurare; Praf; Gel; Lichid; Pigment pe bază de ulei; Pastă; Stilou / Marker; Pudră; Set / Kit; Spray / Aerograf; Altele
hr-HR: Oblik za bojenje hrane: Kapi; Prah; Gel; Tekućina; Pigment na bazi ulja; Pasta; Olovka / marker; Prašak; Set / komplet; Sprej / zračni kist (airbrush); Ostalo
sl-SI: Oblika za barvilo za živila: Kapljice; Prah; Gel; Tekočina; Pigment na oljni osnovi; Pasta; Pisalo/marker; Prašek; Komplet; Sprej/zračni čopič; Drugo
es: Forma del colorante alimentario: Goteo; Polvo fino; Gel; Líquido; Pigmento a base de aceite; Pasta; Bolígrafo / marcador; Polvo; Set/kit; Spray/aerógrafo; Otro
nl: Voedingskleurstof vorm: Druppel; Poeder; Gel; Vloeibaar; Pigment op oliebasis; Pasta; Pen / stift; Poeder; Set / kit; Spray / airbrush; Overige
zh-TW: 食用色素形態: 滴劑; 色粉; 凝膠; 液體; 油基色素; 膏狀; 筆/麥克筆; 粉末; 套裝/工具包; 噴霧/噴槍; 其他
ko: 식용 색소 형태: 드립; 더스트; 젤; 액상; 유성 안료; 페이스트; 펜/마커; 분말; 세트/키트; 스프레이/에어브러시; 기타
ru: Форма пищевого красителя: Капельный; Пыльца; Гель; Жидкий; Пигмент на масляной основе; Паста; Фломастер / маркер; Порошок; Набор; Спрей / аэрограф; Другое
bg-BG: Форма за оцветяване на храна: За стичане (Drip); Дъст (Dust); Гел; Течност; Пигмент на маслена основа; Паста; Писалка/Маркер; Прах; Комплект; Спрей/Аерограф; Друга
vi: Dạng phẩm màu thực phẩm: Dạng nhỏ giọt; Dạng bụi; Dạng gel; Dạng lỏng; Bột màu gốc dầu; Dạng sệt; Bút / Bút lông; Dạng bột; Bộ / Bộ dụng cụ; Dạng xịt / Súng phun; Khác
tr: Gıda boyası formu: Damla; Pudra; Jel; Sıvı; Yağ bazlı pigment; Macun; Kalem / markör; Toz; Set / kit; Sprey / airbrush; Diğer
lt-LT: Maistinių dažų forma: Lašeliai; Dulkės; Gelis; Skystis; Aliejinis pigmentas; Pasta; Rašiklis / flomasteris; Milteliai; Rinkinys; Purškiklis / aerografas; Kita
pt-BR: Forma do corante alimentar: Gota; Pó; Gel; Líquido; Pigmento à base de óleo; Pasta; Caneta/marcador; Pó; Conjunto/kit; Spray/aerógrafo; Outra
cs: Forma potravinářského barviva: Kapky; Prach; Gel; Tekutina; Pigment na bázi oleje; Pasta; Pero/popisovač; Prášek; Sada; Sprej/Airbrush; Jiné
fr: Forme du colorant alimentaire: Goutte; Poudre fine; Gel; Liquide; Pigment à base d'huile; Pâte; Stylo / Feutre; Poudre; Ensemble / Kit; Spray / Aérographe; Autre
zh-CN: 食用色素: 滴剂; 色粉; 凝胶; 液体; 油性色素; 膏状; 笔 / 马克笔; 粉末; 套装 / 套件; 喷雾 / 喷枪; 其他
th: สีผสมอาหารชนิดต่างๆ: หยด; ฝุ่น; เจล; ของเหลว; เม็ดสีสูตรน้ำมัน; เนื้อเปสต์; ปากกา / มาร์กเกอร์; ผง; เซต / ชุดอุปกรณ์; สเปรย์ / แอร์บรัช; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Forma potravinárskeho farbiva: Kvapky; Prášok (prach); Gél; Tekutina; Pigment na báze oleja; Pasta; Pero / fixka; Prášok; Súprava; Sprej / Airbrush; Iné